District of Columbia statutes.
8-903

Enforcement.

The Mayor may establish a special law enforcement unit with police powers to enforce this chapter, Chapter 8 of this title, Chapter 13 of this title, subchapter II of Chapter 1 of this title, and the Water and Sanitation Codes, as compiled in 21 DCMR 700 , et seq.

May 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-117, § 4, 41 DCR 524
1981 Ed., § 6-2913.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 8-901.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 8-901.